West Virginia, session 2025, SB325.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 27, 2024, authorized under the authority of §16A-3-1 of this code, modified by the Department of Health to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 25, 2024, relating to the Department of Health (general provisions of the Medical Cannabis Program, 64 CSR 109), is authorized.